lexc/MTchain.lexc
LEXICON iChainPastSubj
@R.VAR@اومد@R.VAR@ iPastSubjInflInTrans;
@R.VAR@داشت@R.VAR@ iPastSubjInfl;
@R.VA@موند@R.VA@ iPastSubjInflInTrans;
@R.DAR@موند@R.DAR@ iPastSubjInflInTrans;
@R.DAR@اورد@R.DAR@ iPastSubjInfl;
@R.DAR@اومد@R.DAR@ iPastSubjInflInTrans;
@R.BAR@گردوند@R.BAR@ iPastSubjInfl;
@R.BAR@تابوند@R.BAR@ iPastSubjInfl;
@R.BAR@اومد@R.BAR@ iPastSubjInfl;
@R.BAZ@نمایوند@R.BAZ@ iPastSubjInfl;
@R.BAZ@رسوند@R.BAZ@ iPastSubjInfl;
@R.BAZ@خوند@R.BAZ@ iPastSubjInfl;
@R.FARA@خوند@R.FARA@ iPastSubjInfl;!!!!corpus
@R.VAY@ساد@R.VAY@ iPastSubjInflInTrans;!!!!corpus
@R.VAY@ستاد@R.VAY@ iPastSubjInflInTrans;!!!!corpus
@R.VAY@سوند@R.VAY@ iPastSubjInfl;!!!!corpus
@R.VAY@ستوند@R.VAY@ iPastSubjInfl;!!!!corpus
@R.PA@شد@R.PA@ iPastSubjInflInTrans;!!!!corpus
@R.DAR@اورد:ورد@R.DAR@ iPastSubjInfl;
@R.DAR@اومد:ومد@R.DAR@ iPastSubjInflInTrans;
@R.VAR@اومد:ومد@R.VAR@ iPastSubjInflInTrans;
@R.DAR@افتاد:فتاد@R.DAR@ iPastSubjInflInTrans;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!newnew
@R.DAR@افتاد:وفتاد@R.DAR@ iPastSubjInflInTrans;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!newnew
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
@R.BAR@آمد@R.BAR@ PastSubjInflInTrans;
@R.BAR@افراخت@R.BAR@ PastSubjInfl;
@R.BAR@افروخت@R.BAR@ PastSubjInfl;
@R.BAR@انداخت@R.BAR@ PastSubjInfl;
@R.BAR@انگیخت@R.BAR@ PastSubjInfl;
@R.BAR@آورد@R.BAR@ PastSubjInfl;
@R.BAR@چید@R.BAR@ PastSubjInfl;
@R.BAR@داشت@R.BAR@ PastSubjInfl;
@R.BAR@فروخت@R.BAR@ PastSubjInfl;
@R.BAR@گرداند@R.BAR@ PastSubjInfl;
@R.BAR@گرفت@R.BAR@ PastSubjInfl;
@R.BAR@گذشت@R.BAR@ PastSubjInflInTrans;
@R.BAR@گزید@R.BAR@ PastSubjInfl;
@R.BAR@کند@R.BAR@ PastSubjInfl;
@R.BAR@کشد@R.BAR@ PastSubjInfl;
@R.BAR@نهاد@R.BAR@ PastSubjInfl;
@R.BAR@ریخت@R.BAR@ PastSubjInfl;
@R.BAR@شکست@R.BAR@ PastSubjInfl;
@R.BAR@شمرد@R.BAR@ PastSubjInfl;
@R.BAR@شمارد@R.BAR@ PastSubjInfl;
@R.BAR@تابید@R.BAR@ PastSubjInfl;
@R.BAR@خیزید@R.BAR@ PastSubjInflInTrans;
@R.BAR@خورد@R.BAR@ PastSubjInfl;
@R.BAZ@گشت@R.BAZ@ PastSubjInflInTrans;
@R.BAZ@گفت@R.BAZ@ PastSubjInfl;
@R.BAZ@ماند@R.BAZ@ PastSubjInflInTrans;
@R.BAZ@شناخت@R.BAZ@ PastSubjInfl;
@R.BAZ@یافت@R.BAZ@ PastSubjInfl;
@R.FARA@خواند@R.FARA@ PastSubjInfl;!!!!corpus
@R.NEGAH@داشت@R.NEGAH@ PastSubjInfl;
@R.BAR@گشت@R.BAR@ PastSubjInflInTrans;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!new
@R.DAR@آورد@R.DAR@ PastSubjInfl;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!new
@R.DAR@آمد@R.DAR@ PastSubjInflInTrans;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!new
@R.DAR@ماند@R.DAR@ PastSubjInflInTrans;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!new
@R.BAZ@گذاشت@R.BAZ@ PastSubjInfl;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!new
@R.BAZ@رساند@R.BAZ@ PastSubjInfl;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!new
@R.BAZ@خواند@R.BAZ@ PastSubjInfl;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!new
@R.BAZ@نمایاند@R.BAZ@ PastSubjInfl;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!new
@R.BAR@تاباند@R.BAR@ PastSubjInfl;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!new
@R.BAR@داشت@R.BAR@ PastSubjInfl;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!new
@R.VA@داد@R.VA@ PastSubjInfl;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!newnew
@R.DAR@رفت@R.DAR@ PastSubjInfl;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!new
@R.FARA@گرفت@R.FARA@ PastSubjInfl;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!newnew
@R.VA@داشت@R.VA@ PastSubjInfl;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!newnew
@R.VAR@رفت@R.VAR@ PastSubjInflInTrans;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!newnew
@R.VA@رفت@R.VA@ PastSubjInflInTrans;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!newnew
@R.FORU@رفت@R.FORU@ PastSubjInflInTrans;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!newnew
@R.DAR@افتاد@R.DAR@ PastSubjInflInTrans;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!newnew
@R.DAR@یافت@R.DAR@ PastSubjInfl;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!newnew

LEXICON chainPastPP
@R.BAR@آمد@R.BAR@ PastPPInfl;
@R.BAR@افراخت@R.BAR@ PastPPInfl;
@R.BAR@افروخت@R.BAR@ PastPPInfl;
@R.BAR@انداخت@R.BAR@ PastPPInfl;
@R.BAR@انگیخت@R.BAR@ PastPPInfl;
@R.BAR@آورد@R.BAR@ PastPPInfl;
@R.BAR@چید@R.BAR@ PastPPInfl;
@R.BAR@داشت@R.BAR@ PastPPInfl;
@R.BAR@فروخت@R.BAR@ PastPPInfl;
@R.BAR@گرداند@R.BAR@ PastPPInfl;
@R.BAR@گرفت@R.BAR@ PastPPInfl;
@R.BAR@گذشت@R.BAR@ PastPPInfl;
@R.BAR@گزید@R.BAR@ PastPPInfl;
@R.BAR@کند@R.BAR@ PastPPInfl;
@R.BAR@کشد@R.BAR@ PastPPInfl;
@R.BAR@نهاد@R.BAR@ PastPPInfl;
@R.BAR@ریخت@R.BAR@ PastPPInfl;
@R.BAR@شکست@R.BAR@ PastPPInfl;
@R.BAR@شمرد@R.BAR@ PastPPInfl;
@R.BAR@شمارد@R.BAR@ PastPPInfl;
@R.BAR@تابید@R.BAR@ PastPPInfl;
@R.BAR@خیزید@R.BAR@ PastPPInfl;
@R.BAR@خورد@R.BAR@ PastPPInfl;
@R.BAZ@گشت@R.BAZ@ PastPPInfl;
@R.BAZ@گفت@R.BAZ@ PastPPInfl;
@R.BAZ@ماند@R.BAZ@ PastPPInfl;
@R.BAZ@شناخت@R.BAZ@ PastPPInfl;
@R.BAZ@یافت@R.BAZ@ PastPPInfl;
@R.FARA@خواند@R.FARA@ PastPPInfl;!!!!corpus
@R.NEGAH@داشت@R.NEGAH@ PastPPInfl;
@R.BAR@گشت@R.BAR@ PastPPInfl;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!new
@R.DAR@آورد@R.DAR@ PastPPInfl;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!new
@R.DAR@آمد@R.DAR@ PastPPInfl;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!new
@R.DAR@ماند@R.DAR@ PastPPInfl;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!new
@R.BAZ@گذاشت@R.BAZ@ PastPPInfl;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!new
@R.BAZ@رساند@R.BAZ@ PastPPInfl;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!new
@R.BAZ@خواند@R.BAZ@ PastPPInfl;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!new
@R.BAZ@نمایاند@R.BAZ@ PastPPInfl;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!new
@R.BAR@تاباند@R.BAR@ PastPPInfl;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!new
@R.BAR@داشت@R.BAR@ PastPPInfl;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!new
@R.DAR@رفت@R.DAR@ PastPPInfl;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!new
@R.FARA@گرفت@R.FARA@ PastPPInfl;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!newnew
@R.VA@داشت@R.VA@ PastPPInfl;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!newnew
@R.VA@داد@R.VA@ PastPPInfl;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!newnew
@R.VAR@رفت@R.VAR@ PastPPInfl;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!newnew
@R.VA@رفت@R.VA@ PastPPInfl;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!newnew
@R.FORU@رفت@R.FORU@ PastPPInfl;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!newnew
@R.DAR@افتاد@R.DAR@ PastPPInfl;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!newnew
@R.DAR@یافت@R.DAR@ PastPPInfl;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!newnew
